Illinois, session 104th, HB2334.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/3)  (from Ch. 116, par. 203)7    Sec. 3. (a) Each public body shall make available to any 8person for inspection or copying all public records, except as 9otherwise provided in Sections 7 and 8.5 of this Act. 10Notwithstanding any other law, a public body may not grant to 11any person or entity, whether by contract, license, or 12otherwise, the exclusive right to access and disseminate any 13public record as defined in this Act.14    (b) Subject to the fee provisions of Section 6 of this Act, 15each public body shall promptly provide, to any person who 16submits a request, a copy of any public record required to be 17disclosed by subsection (a) of this Section and shall certify 18such copy if so requested.19    (c) Requests for inspection or copies shall be made in 20writing and directed to the public body. Written requests may 21be submitted to a public body via personal delivery, mail, 22telefax, or other means available to the public body. 23Electronic requests under this Section must appear in their   HB2334- 2 -LRB104 07707 BDA 17752 b1entirety within the body of the electronic submission. As a 2cybersecurity measure, no public body shall be required to 3open electronically attached files or hyperlinks to view or 4access details of a request. A public body may honor oral 5requests for inspection or copying. A public body may not 6require that a request be submitted on a standard form or 7require the requester to specify the purpose for a request, 8except to determine whether the records are requested for a 9commercial purpose or whether to grant a request for a fee 10waiver. All requests for inspection and copying received by a 11public body shall immediately be forwarded to its Freedom of 12Information officer or designee. 13    (d) Each public body shall, promptly, either comply with 14or deny a request for public records within 5 business days 15after its receipt of the request, unless the time for response 16is properly extended under subsection (e) of this Section. 17Denial shall be in writing as provided in Section 9 of this 18Act. Failure to comply with a written request, extend the time 19for response, or deny a request within 5 business days after 20its receipt shall be considered a denial of the request. A 21public body that fails to respond to a request within the 22requisite periods in this Section but thereafter provides the 23requester with copies of the requested public records may not 24impose a fee for such copies. A public body that fails to 25respond to a request received may not treat the request as 26unduly burdensome under subsection (g).   HB2334- 3 -LRB104 07707 BDA 17752 b1    (e) The time for response under this Section may be 2extended by the public body for not more than 5 business days 3from the original due date for any of the following reasons:4        (i) the requested records are stored in whole or in 5    part at other locations than the office having charge of 6    the requested records;7        (ii) the request requires the collection of a 8    substantial number of specified records;9        (iii) the request is couched in categorical terms and 10    requires an extensive search for the records responsive to 11    it;12        (iv) the requested records have not been located in 13    the course of routine search and additional efforts are 14    being made to locate them;15        (v) the requested records require examination and 16    evaluation by personnel having the necessary competence 17    and discretion to determine if they are exempt from 18    disclosure under Section 7 of this Act or should be 19    revealed only with appropriate deletions;20        (vi) the request for records cannot be complied with 21    by the public body within the time limits prescribed by 22    subsection (d) of this Section without unduly burdening or 23    interfering with the operations of the public body;24        (vii) there is a need for consultation, which shall be 25    conducted with all practicable speed, with another public 26    body or among 2 or more components of a public body having   HB2334- 4 -LRB104 07707 BDA 17752 b1    a substantial interest in the determination or in the 2    subject matter of the request.3    The person making a request and the public body may agree 4in writing to extend the time for compliance for a period to be 5determined by the parties. If the requester and the public 6body agree to extend the period for compliance, a failure by 7the public body to comply with any previous deadlines shall 8not be treated as a denial of the request for the records. 9    (f) When additional time is required for any of the above 10reasons, the public body shall, within 5 business days after 11receipt of the request, notify the person making the request 12of the reasons for the extension and the date by which the 13response will be forthcoming. Failure to respond within the 14time permitted for extension shall be considered a denial of 15the request. A public body that fails to respond to a request 16within the time permitted for extension but thereafter 17provides the requester with copies of the requested public 18records may not impose a fee for those copies. A public body 19that requests an extension and subsequently fails to respond 20to the request may not treat the request as unduly burdensome 21under subsection (g).22    (g) Requests calling for all records falling within a 23category shall be complied with unless compliance with the 24request would be unduly burdensome for the complying public 25body and there is no way to narrow the request and the burden 26on the public body outweighs the public interest in the   HB2334- 5 -LRB104 07707 BDA 17752 b1information. Before invoking this exemption, the public body 2shall extend to the person making the request an opportunity 3to confer with it in an attempt to reduce the request to 4manageable proportions. If any public body responds to a 5categorical request by stating that compliance would unduly 6burden its operation and the conditions described above are 7met, it shall do so in writing, specifying the reasons why it 8would be unduly burdensome and the extent to which compliance 9will so burden the operations of the public body. Such a 10response shall be treated as a denial of the request for 11information. 12    Repeated requests from the same person for the same 13records that are unchanged or identical to records previously 14provided or properly denied under this Act shall be deemed 15unduly burdensome under this provision.16    (h) Each public body may promulgate rules and regulations 17in conformity with the provisions of this Section pertaining 18to the availability of records and procedures to be followed, 19including:20        (i) the times and places where such records will be 21    made available, and22        (ii) the persons from whom such records may be 23    obtained.24    (i) The time periods for compliance or denial of a request 25to inspect or copy records set out in this Section shall not 26apply to requests for records made for a commercial purpose,   HB2334- 6 -LRB104 07707 BDA 17752 b1requests by a recurrent requester, or voluminous requests. 2Such requests shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 33.1, 3.2, and 3.6 of this Act, as applicable. 4(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.